Maryland, session 2025, HB1474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Board” means the State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists.
(l) (1) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, [one of six types
of licenses] A LICENSE issued by the Board authorizing an individual to practice:
[(1)] (I) Clinical alcohol and drug counseling;
[(2)] (II) Clinical marriage and family therapy;
[(3)] (III) Clinical professional art therapy;
[(4)] (IV) Clinical professional counseling;
[(5)] (V) Graduate alcohol and drug counseling;
[(6)] (VI) Graduate marriage and family therapy;

HOUSE BILL 1474 3
[(7)] (VII) Graduate professional art therapy; or
[(8)] (VIII) Graduate professional counseling.
(2) “LICENSE” INCLUDES, UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES
OTHERWISE, A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE.
(CC) “TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE
BOARD UNDER § 17–304.2 OF THIS TITLE.
17–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual
may not practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice clinical alcohol and drug
counseling, clinical marriage and family therapy, clinical professional art therapy, or
clinical professional counseling in the State unless licensed by the Board.
(b) Subject to the regulations of the Board, subsection (a) of this section does not
apply to:
(1) A student working under the supervision of a licensed mental health care
provider while pursuing a supervised course of study in counseling that the Board approves
as qualifying training and experience under this title; or
(2) An individual who, in accordance with § 17–406 of this title, is working
as a trainee under the supervision of a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor or
another health care provider licensed or certified under this article and approved by the
Board while fulfilling the experiential or course of study requirements under § 17–302 of this
subtitle or § 17–403 or § 17–404 of this title.
(c) This subtitle may not be construed to limit the scope of practice of any
individual who is duly licensed under this article.
17–304.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 10–101 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(3) “STUDENT” MEANS AN OUT–OF–STATE RESIDENT ENROLLED AT
AND RESIDING AT OR NEAR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1474
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE TO AN
APPLICANT WHO:
(1) IS NOT LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY
LAW TO PRACTICE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE UNDER
THIS ARTICLE;
(2) IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO
PROVIDE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING OR COUNSELING SERVICES IN
ANOTHER STATE;
(3) IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE REGULATORY AUTHORITY IN THE
OTHER STATE;
(4) MEETS ANY OTHER QUALIFICATIONS SET BY THE BOARD IN
REGULATIONS; AND
(5) SUBMITS A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE APPLICATION.
(C) A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION
AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO PROVIDE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING
SERVICES THROUGH TELEHEALTH IN THE STATE ONLY TO A STUDENT ATTENDING
AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE IF THE STUDENT AND THE
OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR HAVE A PREVIOUSLY
ESTABLISHED THERAPEUTIC RELATIONSHIP THAT HAS EXISTED FOR AT LEAST 6
MONTHS.
(D) THE TERM OF A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION IS 6 MONTHS.
(E) A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
NOT BE RENEWED.
(F) IF THE HOLDER OF A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE VIOLATES THIS
TITLE, THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE THE INDIVIDUAL A REGULAR LICENSE UNDER
THIS TITLE FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE VIOLATION
OCCURRED.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(1) TO ESTABLISH QUALIFICATIONS AND APPLICATION FEES FOR A
TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION;

HOUSE BILL 1474 5
(2) TO ESTABLISH ANY CONDITIONS OR LIMITATIONS APPLICABLE TO
A TEMPORARY TELEHEALTH LICENSEE; AND
(3) NECESSARY FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION, ADMINISTRATION, AND
ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SECTION.
1–1005.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 1–1005.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A health care
practitioner providing health care services through telehealth must be licensed, certified,
or otherwise authorized by law to provide health care services in the State if the health
care services are being provided to a patient located in the State.
1–1005.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF PROFESSIONAL
COUNSELORS AND THERAPISTS.
(3) “INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 10–101 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(3) (4) “OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR”
MEANS A LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR WHO:
(I) IS NOT LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED
BY LAW TO PRACTICE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE UNDER
THIS ARTICLE; BUT
(II) 1. IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE
AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO PROVIDE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING OR
COUNSELING SERVICES IN ANOTHER STATE; AND
2. IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE REGULATORY
AUTHORITY IN THE OTHER STATE.
(4) (5) “PRACTICE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 17–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) (6) “STUDENT” MEANS AN OUT–OF–STATE RESIDENT
ENROLLED AT AND RESIDING AT OR NEAR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1474
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO A STUDENT:
(1) WHO ESTABLISHES RESIDENCY IN THE STATE; OR
(2) ENROLLED IN A HEALTH INSURANCE BENEFIT PLAN IN THE STATE
THAT RESTRICTS COVERAGE TO IN–STATE HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS.
(C) AN OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR MAY
PROVIDE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING SERVICES THROUGH TELEHEALTH
IN THE STATE ONLY TO A STUDENT ATTENDING AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION IN THE STATE IF:
(1) THE STUDENT AND THE OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED
PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR HAVE A PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED THERAPEUTIC
RELATIONSHIP THAT HAS EXISTED FOR AT LEAST 6 MONTHS; AND
(2) THE CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING SERVICES ARE
PROVIDED TO THE STUDENT NOT MORE THAN:
(I) 5 DAYS IN ANY 1 MONTH; OR
(II) 15 DAYS IN 1 CALENDAR YEAR THE OUT–OF–STATE
LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR:
(I) NOTIFIES THE BOARD THAT THE OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED
PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR WILL BE PROVIDING CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL
COUNSELING SERVICES THROUGH TELEHEALTH TO A STUDENT ATTENDING AN
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE; AND
(II) PROVIDES THE BOARD WITH THE OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED
PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR’S CONTACT AND LICENSING INFORMATION.
(D) IF THE INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2)(II) OF THIS
SECTION CHANGES, THE OUT–OF–STATE LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR
SHALL NOTIFY THE BOARD WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE CHANGE OCCURS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) If the Counseling Compact Commission, established under the Interstate
Licensed Professional Counselors Compact under Title 17, Subtitle 6B of the Health
Occupations Article, begins issuing compact privileges to licensed professional counselors
in member states to practice professional counseling in remote states in accordance with
the Compact, with no further action required by the General Assembly, this Act shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.

HOUSE BILL 1474 7
(b) The State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists shall notify the
Department of Legislative Services within 5 days after receiving notice the Counseling
Compact Commission has begun issuing the compact privileges described under subsection
(a) of this section.
SECTION 3 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.